New Jersey, session 221, A3402.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Gang assault.  A person is guilty of a crime of the third degree when, with intent to cause bodily injury to another person and when aided by two or more other persons actually present, he causes bodily injury to such person or to a third person. "Bodily injury" shall have the meaning set forth in N.J.S.2C:11-1. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.